dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.dic
ambivalentnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
apanáž/D po:noun is:feminine
atraktívnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
aviváž/D po:noun is:feminine
báň/CD po:noun is:feminine po:noun is:masculine
bázeň/D po:noun is:feminine
betonáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
bezdôvodnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
bezpredmetnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
biblickosť/K po:noun is:feminine
biozáťaž/D po:noun is:feminine
bolesť/K po:noun is:feminine
brusiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
cementáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
cennosť/K po:noun is:feminine
čakáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
čapatosť/K po:noun is:feminine
čereň/D po:noun is:feminine
čiernozem/D po:noun is:feminine
črvač/D po:noun is:feminine
danosť/K po:noun is:feminine
dekoltáž/D po:noun is:feminine
depresívnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
dlhosť/K po:noun is:feminine
dolkáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
doslovnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
dreváreň/D po:noun is:feminine
drobnozrnnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
dvojpohlavnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
ekvipáž/D po:noun is:feminine
emocionálnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
fádnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
fajčiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
fermež/D po:noun is:feminine
frézareň/D po:noun is:feminine
frivolnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
gombikáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
guráž/D po:noun is:feminine
hanblivosť/K po:noun is:feminine
háveď/D po:noun is:feminine
hĺbkotlač/D po:noun is:feminine
hmotnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
holeň/D po:noun is:feminine
hriešnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
hvezdáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
charakternosť/K po:noun is:feminine
chatrč/D po:noun is:feminine
chrobač/D po:noun is:feminine
chvályhodnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
indeterminovanosť/K po:noun is:feminine
invariantnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
jedáleň/D po:noun is:feminine
jednostrannosť/K po:noun is:feminine
kačičiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
kameňotlač/D po:noun is:feminine
kartonáž/D po:noun is:feminine
kĺzavosť/K po:noun is:feminine
kníhtlač/D po:noun is:feminine
koľaj/D po:noun is:feminine
kolportáž/D po:noun is:feminine
konfliktnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
korkáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
korozívnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
krádež/D po:noun is:feminine
krvnatosť/K po:noun is:feminine
kyretáž/D po:noun is:feminine
lahôdkáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
lákavosť/K po:noun is:feminine
ledač/D po:noun is:feminine
likvidnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
listáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
lož/D po:noun is:feminine
magnezitáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
maličkosť/K po:noun is:feminine
mater/D po:noun is:feminine
mäsožravosť/K po:noun is:feminine
meniareň/D po:noun is:feminine
mimovoľnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
mináž/D po:noun is:feminine
mládež/D po:noun is:feminine
mohutnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
montáž/D po:noun is:feminine
mučiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
mylnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
náhodilosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nálož/D po:noun is:feminine
náruživosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nečestnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nedobizeň/D po:noun is:feminine
nedotiahnutosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nejednotnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nemorálnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
neodkladnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nepočetnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nepredvídanosť/K po:noun is:feminine
neproduktívnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nesmelosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nesystematickosť/K po:noun is:feminine
neuváženosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nevyspelosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nezničiteľnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
nocľaháreň/D po:noun is:feminine
obetavosť/K po:noun is:feminine
obliekáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
obsiahlosť/K po:noun is:feminine
obyčaj/D po:noun is:feminine
odôvodnenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
odpoveď/D po:noun is:feminine
omamnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
ortuť/K po:noun is:feminine
otrávenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
palacinkáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
papiereň/D po:noun is:feminine
pasáž/D po:noun is:feminine
patriarchálnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
pečeň/D po:noun is:feminine
pieseň/D po:noun is:feminine
plášť/D po:noun is:feminine
platbyschopnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
pleť/D po:noun is:feminine
plť/D po:noun is:feminine
početnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
podobizeň/D po:noun is:feminine
podvojnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
politickosť/K po:noun is:feminine
popletenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
posteľ/D po:noun is:feminine
potuteľnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
povodeň/D po:noun is:feminine
pôsobivosť/K po:noun is:feminine
pramať/D po:noun is:feminine
prdel/D po:noun is:feminine
precibrenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
preglejkáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
premrštenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
pretlač/D po:noun is:feminine
prezamestnanosť/K po:noun is:feminine
priazeň/D po:noun is:feminine
príchuť/D po:noun is:feminine
prijateľnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
prízvučnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
provinciálnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
prvotlač/D po:noun is:feminine
raž/D po:noun is:feminine
realistickosť/K po:noun is:feminine
reťaz/D po:noun is:feminine
riaditeľnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
rozdielnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
rozkoš/D po:noun is:feminine
rozpačitosť/K po:noun is:feminine
rozvážnosť/KN po:noun is:feminine
rýchločistiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
samoopelivosť/K po:noun is:feminine
samospúšť/D po:noun is:feminine
senáž/D po:noun is:feminine
servilnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
skláreň/D po:noun is:feminine
skostnatenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
slobodáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
slobodomilovnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
snuť/D po:noun is:feminine
spáliteľnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
spiež/D po:noun is:feminine
spomalenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
sprcháreň/D po:noun is:feminine
staromódnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
stáž/D po:noun is:feminine
striedmosť/K po:noun is:feminine
striž/D po:noun is:feminine
sugestívnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
súkáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
súťaž/D po:noun is:feminine
svätosť/K po:noun is:feminine
symetrickosť/K po:noun is:feminine
sypáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
šeď/D po:noun is:feminine
šiplavosť/K po:noun is:feminine
špekulatívnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
špionáž/D po:noun is:feminine
ťahavosť/K po:noun is:feminine
taviareň/D po:noun is:feminine
teplomilnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
tieseň/D po:noun is:feminine
tlačiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
továreň/D po:noun is:feminine
triediareň/D po:noun is:feminine
triviálnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
trsť/D po:noun is:feminine
tvrdosť/K po:noun is:feminine
tyč/D po:noun is:feminine
ukonanosť/K po:noun is:feminine
ulievareň/D po:noun is:feminine
uponáhžanosť/K po:noun is:feminine
useň/D po:noun is:feminine
úspornosť/K po:noun is:feminine
uvedomelosť/K po:noun is:feminine
varivosť/K po:noun is:feminine
vášeň/D po:noun is:feminine
veselosť/K po:noun is:feminine
veštiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
visáž/D po:noun is:feminine
vlnitosť/K po:noun is:feminine
vodáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
všeobecnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
výdrž/D po:noun is:feminine
vychytenosť/K po:noun is:feminine
výraznosť/KN po:noun is:feminine
výš/D po:noun is:feminine
vývojaschopnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
zadlženosť/K po:noun is:feminine
zaliečavosť/K po:noun is:feminine
zápalkáreň/D po:noun is:feminine
zapracovanosť/K po:noun is:feminine
záväznosť/K po:noun is:feminine
zbraň/D po:noun is:feminine
zemežlč/D po:noun is:feminine
zhovädilosť/K po:noun is:feminine
zlieváreň/D po:noun is:feminine
zmeniteľnosť/K po:noun is:feminine
zvesť/K po:noun is:feminine
železiareň/D po:noun is:feminine
žlč/D po:noun is:feminine
